New York, session 2025-2026, A4309.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 170-i 2 to read as follows: 3 § 170-i. COVID-19 mask and face covering mandate. 1. No state agency 4 shall promulgate rules, regulations or any form of guidance requiring 5 individuals under the age of eighteen who are not exhibiting COVID-19 6 related symptoms, as defined by the centers for disease control and 7 prevention, to wear a mask or face covering in a public place or while 8 participating in any recreational or organized sporting activity. 9 2. For the purposes of this section: 10 (a) "state agency" shall mean any executive department, bureau, 11 commission, agency, board or other agency, any public authority, and the 12 judiciary and the legislature. 13 (b) "face-covering" shall include, but not be limited to, cloth masks, 14 surgical masks or N95 respirators. 15 (c) "public place" shall not include facilities established pursuant 16 to article twenty-eight of the public health law or private health care 17 facilities. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04333-01-5